Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 2 Intrastate Pipelines and Distribution Systems

46-4-20.
“Person” defined.

As used in this article, the term “person” means any corporation, whether public or private; company; individual; firm; partnership; or association.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 14.

46-4-21.
Certificate of public convenience and necessity required by persons constructing or operating gas pipeline or distribution systems for transportation, distribution, or sale of gas; distribution systems in operation before February 17, 1956; jurisdiction of commission generally.

No person shall construct or operate in intrastate commerce within this state any pipeline or distribution system, or any extension thereof, for the transportation, distribution, or sale of natural or manufactured gas without first obtaining from the commission a certificate that the public convenience and necessity require such construction or operation. In addition, no person shall sell natural or manufactured gas from such pipeline or acquire ownership or control of such pipeline or distribution system, whether directly or indirectly, without obtaining from the commission a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

This article shall not be construed to require any gas distribution system to secure a certificate for an extension within any municipality within which such gas distribution system has lawfully commenced operations prior to February 17, 1956, or for an extension within or to territory already served by such gas distribution system, which extension is necessary in the ordinary course of business, or for substitute facilities within or to any municipality or territory already served by such gas distribution system, or for an extension into territory contiguous to that already served by such gas distribution system and not receiving similar service from another such person if no certificate of public convenience and necessity has been issued to or applied for by any other person covering such territory.

As to distribution and sales in intrastate commerce, all gas pipeline systems shall be subject to the regulation and jurisdiction of the commission in all respects, including, but not limited to, rates, charges, rules, regulations, service, financing, accounts, and such other matters involving a privately owned gas public utility distribution system as are subject to the regulation or jurisdiction of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 1.

Cross references.

Exercise of power of eminent domain for purposes of constructing gas pipelines, §

22-3-83

.

46-4-22.
Determination by commission of manner and form of application for certificate of public convenience and necessity; giving of notice of receipt of application.

The manner and form of application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity provided for in Code Section 46-4-21 shall be established by such rules and regulations as the commission may from time to time prescribe. Upon the receipt of any such application, the commission shall cause notice thereof to be given by personal service or by mail to the chief executive officer of any municipality affected and to any person serving the territory affected, and shall publish such notice once a week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in each territory affected.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 3.

46-4-23.
Power of commission to issue or deny certificate.

The commission shall have power, after hearing, to issue the certificate of public convenience and necessity, as prayed for, or to refuse to issue the same, or to issue it for the construction, operation, or acquisition of a portion only of the contemplated pipeline or distribution system or extension thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 4.

46-4-24.
Application for certificate by persons engaged in constructing or operating gas pipeline or distribution system or extension thereof as of February 17, 1956.

Any person engaged in the construction or operation of any pipeline or distribution system, or any extension thereof, as of February 17, 1956, shall be entitled to receive a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the commission authorizing that person to continue the construction or operation of such pipeline or distribution system, or any extension thereof, in the territory being served by that person on February 17, 1956, if by February 17, 1957, that person filed maps with the commission showing the territory being served by that person.

If, pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, more than one person filed maps indicating service in the same territory, the commission shall, after a hearing conducted after the giving of reasonable notice to the interested parties, determine from such evidence as it may reasonably require which of such persons shall be entitled to the certificate of public convenience and necessity. In making such determination, the commission shall consider the ability of such persons to furnish thereafter reasonably adequate service in the territory in question.

Pending the granting of a certificate as provided in this Code section, a person applying for such certificate under this Code section may lawfully continue the construction or operation of any pipeline or distribution system, or any extension thereof, in the territory being served by such person on February 17, 1956.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 5.

46-4-25.
Factors to be considered by commission in granting certificates.

In determining whether a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be granted, the commission must consider the following:

Whether existing gas pipelines or distribution systems are adequate to meet the reasonable public needs;

The volume of demand for such gas, and whether such demand and that reasonably to be anticipated in the future can support already existing gas pipeline and distribution systems, if any, and also the pipeline or distribution system proposed by the applicant;

The financial ability of the applicant to furnish adequate continuous service and to meet the financial obligations of the service which the applicant proposes to perform;

The adequacy of the supply of gas to serve the public;

The economic feasibility of the pipeline or distribution system and the propriety of the engineering and contracting fees, the expenses, and the financing charges and costs connected with the pipeline or distribution system; and

The effect on existing revenues and service of other pipelines or distribution systems, and particularly whether the granting of the certificate will or may seriously impair existing public service.

This Code section shall not be construed as exhaustively describing all factors which the commission may consider in its decision to grant or deny a certificate.

If the applicant seeks a certificate of public convenience and necessity authorizing the applicant to acquire a gas pipeline or distribution system of a municipal corporation, the commission shall also consider whether the purchase price is reasonable in light of the present value of the system to be acquired. Issuance by the commission of a certificate of public convenience and necessity authorizing such acquisition is a determination by the commission, among other things, that the purchase price is the measure of the value of the system to be included in the applicant’s rate base for rate-making purposes, subject to the depreciation thereafter allowed upon such system.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 7; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1804, § 1.

46-4-26.
Filing with commission complaints regarding persons operating without certificate; cease and desist order by commission; hearing; final order of commission.

Whenever any person is engaged or is about to engage in the construction, operation, or acquisition of any gas pipeline or distribution system, or extension thereof, without having secured a certificate of public convenience and necessity as required by this article, any interested person may file a complaint with the commission. The commission may, with or without notice, make an order requiring the person complained of to cease and desist from such construction, operation, or acquisition until the commission makes and files its decision on said complaint or until the further order of the commission. The commission may, after a hearing conducted after reasonable notice, make such order and prescribe such terms and conditions with respect to the matter as are just and reasonable.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 6.

46-4-27.
Unreasonable interference with existing pipeline or distribution systems or service by persons constructing or extending pipeline or distribution systems.

If any person in constructing or extending his pipeline or distribution system unreasonably interferes or is about to interfere unreasonably with any pipeline or distribution system or service of any other person, the commission, on its own initiative or on complaint of any person claiming to be injuriously affected, may, after a hearing conducted after reasonable notice, make such order and prescribe such terms and conditions with respect to the matter as are just and reasonable.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 2.

46-4-28.
Suspension, revocation, alteration, or amendment of certificates by commission.

At any time after notice and opportunity to be heard, and for reasonable cause, the commission may suspend, revoke, alter, or amend any certificate issued under this article if it appears that the holder of the certificate has willfully violated or refused to observe any of the lawful and reasonable orders, rules, or regulations prescribed by the commission or any other law of this state regulating these pipeline or distribution systems, or if in the opinion of the commission the holder of the certificate is not furnishing adequate service, or if the continuance of the certificate in its original form is incompatible with the public interest.

(a.1)

Any certificate issued under this article shall be revoked or amended by the commission upon application to the commission by a person to provide natural gas service to a specified end-use customer, property owner, or developer who has requested natural gas service if the holder of the certificate has failed to begin construction or operation of any pipeline, or distribution system, or any extension thereof, in substantially all of the territory covered by such certificate. Once a person has filed such an application, the portion of the certificate of the territory for which the applicant is seeking to provide natural gas service to a specified end-use customer, property owner, or developer shall be deemed revoked or amended. The commission shall determine whether the applicant shall be entitled to a certificate for the territory that has been excluded from the certificate by revocation or amendment, whether such territory should be re-issued to the person who held the certificate at the time of the application, or whether such territory shall be deemed uncertificated. The commission shall make such determination within 90 days of the application and shall consider, in addition to the factors set forth in subsection (a) of Code Section 46-4-25, whether the applicant can offer service in a timely manner, and such other factors the commission deems in the public interest. The commission in determining whether to reissue a certificate to the person who held the certificate at the time of the application shall consider the length of time the certificate was held without service being provided. The newly certificated area shall be designed by the commission to serve the customers, property owners, or developers in question while ensuring a boundary with safety and public welfare as the focus.

If and when the commission undertakes to revoke or modify any certificate on the ground that conditions are such as not to justify the number of certificates which have been granted within the territory involved, preference shall be given to certificates in order of the time of their issuance, so that those which have been issued later in time shall, other things being equal, be canceled rather than those issued earlier in time.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 9; Ga. L. 2007, p. 676, § 1/HB 587.

The 2007 amendment,

effective May 29, 2007, added subsection (a.1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 676, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to all certificates in effect or applied for on or after May 29, 2007.

46-4-29.
Transfer and hypothecation of certificates.

Any certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this article may be transferred or hypothecated only upon application to and approval by the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 10.

46-4-30.
Jurisdiction of commission over controversies as to extensions of gas distribution service; factors to be considered by commission in resolving controversies.

Whenever a certificate of public convenience and necessity has been issued to a gas distribution system and a controversy arises as to whether an extension of service should or should not be made within the territory included in the certificate, the commission shall have jurisdiction to determine whether or not such extension shall be made and, if so, upon what terms. In making this determination, the commission shall consider the economic feasibility of that particular extension and the supply of gas available therefor. This Code section shall not apply to extensions of gas distribution systems by municipalities and counties of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 13.

46-4-31.
Adoption by commission of rules and orders to enforce article.

The commission is authorized to adopt such rules and orders as it may deem necessary in the enforcement of this article. Without limiting its authority to adopt rules and orders in general, the commission may by such rules and orders determine not only the locations or territories to be served but also the volumes of gas to be sold by pipelines direct to consumers. The commission may also define what territories are contiguous to others.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 8.

46-4-32.
Applicability of article to liquefied petroleum gas sold in liquid form under pressure.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to liquefied petroleum gas sold in liquid form under pressure.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 11.

Cross references.

Sale and storage of liquefied petroleum gas, §

10-1-260

et seq.

46-4-33.
Applicability of certificate requirements under article generally.

Notwithstanding any other statute or ordinance to the contrary, the requirements of this article for a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall apply to each and every individual and to each and every firm or corporation, whether public or private, excepting only municipal corporations and counties of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 104, § 12.

46-4-34.
Injunctions.

In addition to the civil monetary penalty provided for in Code Section 46-4-35, the commission may bring a civil action to enjoin a violation of any provision of this article or of any rule, regulation, or order issued by the commission under this article. In order to obtain this equitable relief, the commission shall not be required to allege or prove that there is no adequate remedy at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 145, § 2.

46-4-35.
Civil penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article, or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the commission under this article, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.00 for each day that such violation persists, provided that the maximum civil penalty shall not exceed $200,000.00 for any related series of violations.

A civil penalty under subsection (a) of this Code section may be imposed by the commission only after notice and hearing. In determining the amount of the penalty, the commission shall consider the size of the business charged, the gravity of the violation, and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance after notice of a violation. The amount of such penalty may be collected by the commission in the manner provided in Code Section 9-11-69 for the enforcement of money judgments.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 145, § 1.